Washington statutes.
RCW 9.16.041

Counterfeit items—Seizure and forfeiture.

(1) Any items bearing a counterfeit mark, and all personal property employed or used in connection with counterfeiting, including but not limited to, any items, objects, tools, machines, equipment, instruments, or vehicles of any kind, shall be seized by any law enforcement officer.

All seized personal property referenced in this subsection shall be forfeited in accordance with RCW 10.105.010.

(2) Upon request of the intellectual property owner, all seized items bearing a counterfeit mark shall be released to the intellectual property owner for destruction or disposition.

(3) If the intellectual property owner does not request release of seized items bearing a counterfeit mark, such items shall be destroyed unless the intellectual property owner consents to another disposition.

[ 1999 c 322 s 4.]